Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 471.805 is amended to read:
471.805. (1)(a) Except  as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section and ORS 471.810
(2), all [ money] moneys collected by the Oregon Liquor  Control Commission under this chapter and
ORS chapter 473 and as privilege taxes shall be remitted to the State Treasurer who shall credit
[it] the moneys  to a suspense account of  the commission. Whenever the commission determines that
the commission has received  moneys [ have been received by it ] in excess of  the amount legally due
and payable to the commission [ or that it has received money to which it has no legal interest ], that
the commission has received moneys to which the commission has  no legal interest  or that
any license fee or deposit is properly refundable, the  commission is authorized and directed to re-
fund such [ money] moneys by check drawn upon the State Treasurer and charged to the suspense
account of the commission.
(b) After withholding refundable license  fees and [ such] a sum, not to exceed $250,000, as [ it]
the commission  considers necessary as a revolving fund for a working cash balance for the purpose
of paying travel expenses, advances, other miscellaneous bills and extraordinary items which  are
payable in cash immediately upon presentation, the commission shall direct the State Treasurer  to
transfer the [ money] moneys remaining in  the suspense account to the Oregon Liquor Control
Commission Account in  the General Fund. Moneys in the Oregon Liquor Control Commission Ac-
count are continuously appropriated to  the commission to be distributed and used as required or
allowed by law.
(2) All  necessary expenditures of the commission incurred in carrying out the purposes required
of the commission by law,  including the salaries of [ its] the commission’s  employees, purchases
made by the commission and such sums necessary to reimburse the $250,000 revolving  fund, shall
be audited and paid  from the Oregon Liquor Control Commission Account in the General Fund, upon
warrants drawn by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  pursuant to claims duly ap-
proved by the commission.
(3)(a) Moneys from the retail sale of distilled  liquor that are being held by an agent appointed
under ORS 471.750 or by a distillery retail  outlet agent appointed under ORS 471.230 are not subject
to ORS 295.001 to 295.108 if the  agent has on deposit with the commission an amount equaling or
exceeding an amount the commission, in [ its] the commission’s  discretion, deems  to be reasonable
and sufficient and [ to be ] that is  not  less than the average daily gross receipts from retail sales of
distilled liquor by the agent.
Enrolled House Bill 3344 (HB 3344-A) Page 1
(b) The commission shall remit moneys deposited with the commission  under this subsection to
the State  Treasurer for deposit to a separate reserve account of the commission. Moneys in the re-
serve account are not revenue of the commission for purposes of ORS 221.770. The commission  shall
return the deposit, and any interest earned on the deposit, if the appointment of the agent  termi-
nates and the agent  has forwarded to the commission all moneys owed the commission from retail
sales of distilled liquor by the agent.
(c) An agent described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection shall make the deposits and
report the receipts described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection to the commission on a
monthly basis. The commission may adopt rules to carry out this paragraph.
Passed by House April 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3344 (HB 3344-A) Page 2